Connecticut, session 2026, SB00475.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. Subsection (a) of section 4b-52 of the general statutes is
repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1,
2026):
(a) (1) Except as provided in subdivision (2) of subsection (b) of this
section, no repairs, alterations or additions involving expense to the
state of one million dollars or less or, in the case of repairs, alterations
or additions to a building rented or occupied by (A) the Judicial Branch,
three million dollars or less, or (B) a constituent unit of the state system
of higher education, three million dollars or less, shall be made to any
state building or premises occupied by any state officer, department,
institution, board, commission or council of the state government and
no contract for any construction, repairs, alteration or addition shall be
entered into without the prior approval of the Commissioner of
Administrative Services, except repairs, alterations or additions to a
building under the supervision and control of the Joint Committee on
Legislative Management or the Military Department and repairs,
alterations or additions to a building under the supervision of The
University of Connecticut. Repairs, alterations or additions which are
made pursuant to such approval of the Commissioner of Administrative

Substitute Senate Bill No. 475
Services shall conform to all guidelines and procedures established by
the Department of Administrative Services for agency-administered
projects. (2) Notwithstanding the provisions of subdivision (1) of this
subsection, (A) repairs, alterations or additions involving expense to the
state of five hundred thousand dollars or less may be made to any state
building or premises under the supervision of [the Office of the Chief
Court Administrator or] a constituent unit of the state system of higher
education, under the terms of section 4b-11, and [any] (B) repairs,
alterations or additions involving expense to the state of three million
or less may be made to any state building or premises under the
supervision of the Office of the Chief Court Administrator under the
terms of section 4b-11. Any contract for any such construction, repairs
or alteration pursuant to subdivision (2) of this subsection may be
entered into by the Office of the Chief Court Administrator or a
constituent unit of the state system of higher education without the
approval of the Commissioner of Administrative Services.
Sec. 2. Section 4b-1 of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
The Commissioner of Administrative Services shall (1) be responsible
for the administrative functions of construction and planning of all
capital improvements undertaken by the state, except (A) highway and
bridge construction, the construction and planning of capital
improvements related to mass transit, marine and aviation
transportation, (B) the Connecticut Marketing Authority, (C) planning
and construction of capital improvements to the State Capitol building
or the Legislative Office Building and related facilities by the Joint
Committee on Legislative Management, (D) any project as defined in
subdivision (16) of section 10a-109c, undertaken by The University of
Connecticut, and (E) construction and planning of capital
improvements related to the Judicial Department if such construction
and planning pursuant to this subdivision do not [constitute a project
Public Act No. 26-92 2 of 55

Substitute Senate Bill No. 475
within the meaning of subdivision (6) of section 4b-55] involve an
expenditure of more than three million dollars, including the
preparation of preliminary plans, estimates of cost, development of
designs, working plans and specifications, award of contracts and
supervision and inspection. For the purposes of this subparagraph (E),
the term "Judicial Department" does not include the courts of probate,
the Division of Criminal Justice and the Public Defender Services
Commission, except where such agencies share facilities in state-
maintained courts; (2) select consultant firms in accordance with the
provisions of sections 4b-56 to 4b-59, inclusive, to assist in the
development of plans and specifications when in the commissioner's
judgment such assistance is desirable; (3) render technical advice and
service to all state agencies in the preparation and correlation of plans
for necessary improvement of their physical plants; and (4) cooperate
with those charged with fiscal programming and budget formulation in
the development of a capital program and a capital budget for the state.
Sec. 3. Section 4-58 of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
(a) Notwithstanding the provisions of chapter 859 and except as
provided in [subsection (b)] subsections (b) and (c) of this section, any
unclaimed article of jewelry or any accumulation of such articles or
valuables in the custody of the administrative head of any state
institution shall be retained by such administrative head for a period of
three years, during which period he shall make every reasonable effort
to return each such article to its owner. At the end of said period such
administrative head may sell or otherwise dispose of such article with
the approval of the governing board of such institution. Any revenue
derived from the sale of any such articles shall be credited to the
"institutional general welfare fund" of the institution in which they were
found and, if from any institution not having such a fund, shall be paid
to the State Treasurer and credited to the General Fund of the state.
Public Act No. 26-92 3 of 55

Substitute Senate Bill No. 475
(b) The Commissioner of Correction shall adopt regulations in
accordance with the provisions of chapter 54 to set forth the manner in
which the department shall sell or otherwise dispose of any unclaimed
inmate property, clothing or jewelry after reasonable efforts have been
made to return the same to the rightful owner. All proceeds from any
such sale shall be deposited in the General Fund and credited to the
Criminal Injuries Compensation Fund established by section 54-215.
(c) The Chief Court Administrator shall establish a procedure to set
forth the manner in which the Judicial Branch shall sell or otherwise
dispose of any unclaimed clothing, jewelry or other personal property
of a detainee after reasonable efforts have been made to return such
clothing, jewelry or personal property to the detainee. All proceeds from
any such sale shall be deposited in the General Fund and credited to the
Criminal Injuries Compensation Fund established by section 54-215.
Sec. 4. Subsection (h) of section 46b-15f of the general statutes is
repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1,
2026):
(h) For each year that funding is provided for the program under this
section, the organization administering the program shall either
conduct, or partner with an academic institution or other qualified
entity for the purpose of conducting, an analysis of the impact of the
program, including, but not limited to, (1) the procedural outcomes for
applications filed in association with services provided by grant
recipients under the program, (2) the types and extent of legal services
provided to individuals served pursuant to the program, including on
matters ancillary to the restraining order application, and (3) the
number of cases where legal services were provided before an
application was filed but legal representation did not continue during
the restraining order process and the reasons for such limited
representations. Not later than [July first] September thirtieth of the year
following any year in which the program received funding, the
Public Act No. 26-92 4 of 55

Substitute Senate Bill No. 475
organization administering the program shall submit a report on the
results of such analysis in accordance with the provisions of section 11-
4a, to the joint standing committee of the General Assembly having
cognizance of matters relating to the judiciary. [Not later than December
1, 2023, the organization administering the program shall submit a
report in accordance with the provisions of section 11-4a, to the joint
standing committee of the General Assembly having cognizance of
matters relating to the judiciary on the potential state-wide expansion of
the program. Such report shall include, but not be limited to: (A)
Whether there are or could be a sufficient number of grant recipients to
administer the program in each applicable courthouse in the state; (B)
which, if any, courthouse in the state is not a feasible location for
expansion of the program; and (C) the level of funding needed to fund
a state-wide expansion of the program.]
Sec. 5. Subsection (c) of section 46b-38c of the general statutes is
repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1,
2026):
(c) Each such local family violence intervention unit shall: (1) Accept
referrals of family violence cases from a judge or prosecutor, (2) prepare
written or oral reports on each case for the court by the next court date
to be presented at any time during the court session on that date, (3)
provide or arrange for services to victims and offenders, (4) administer
contracts to carry out such services, and (5) establish centralized
reporting procedures. All information provided to a family relations
counselor, family relations counselor trainee or family services
supervisor employed by the [Judicial Department] Court Support
Services Division of the Judicial Branch in a local family violence
intervention unit shall be used solely for the purposes of preparation of
the report and the protective order forms for each case and
recommendation of services and shall otherwise be confidential and
retained in the files of such unit and not be subject to subpoena or other
Public Act No. 26-92 5 of 55

Substitute Senate Bill No. 475
court process for use in any other proceeding or for any other purpose,
except that a family relations counselor, family relations counselor
trainee or family services supervisor employed by the [Judicial
Department] Court Support Services Division:
(A) Shall disclose to the court and the prosecuting authority for
appropriate action information that the victim has indicated that the
defendant holds a permit to carry a pistol or revolver, possesses one or
more firearms or possesses ammunition;
(B) Shall disclose to an employee of the Department of Children and
Families: [information] (i) Information that indicates that a defendant
poses a danger or threat to a child or a custodial parent of the child; and
(ii) information about the progress and compliance with court-ordered
intervention and services when there are open cases within both the
family violence intervention unit and the Department of Children and
Families, which information shall be used for the sole purpose of child
protection services and shall not be used in any other court proceeding
unless otherwise authorized by law;
(C) May disclose to another [family relations counselor, family
relations counselor trainee or family services supervisor information
pursuant to guidelines adopted by the Chief Court Administrator]
employee of the Court Support Services Division, as authorized by the
executive director or designee of such division, all files and reports
regarding the defendant for purposes of: (i) Determining whether to
recommend pretrial release; (ii) preparing a presentence investigation
report or a pre-dispositional study; (iii) determining the supervision,
both pretrial and post-conviction, and service needs of a child or youth
or any other person referred to such division; and (iv) monitoring and
enforcing conditions of release or probation;
[(D) May disclose to a bail commissioner or an intake, assessment and
referral specialist employed by the Judicial Department information
Public Act No. 26-92 6 of 55

Substitute Senate Bill No. 475
regarding a defendant who is on or is being considered for pretrial
release;]
[(E)] (D) May disclose to a law enforcement agency information that
indicates that a defendant poses a danger or threat to another person;
[(F) May disclose, after disposition of a family violence case, to a
probation officer or a juvenile probation officer, for purposes of
determining service needs and supervision levels, information
regarding a defendant who has been convicted and sentenced to a
period of probation in the family violence case;
(G) May disclose, after a conviction in a family violence case, to a
probation officer for the purpose of preparing a presentence
investigation report, any information regarding the defendant that has
been provided to the family relations counselor, family relations
counselor trainee or family services supervisor in the case or in any
other case that resulted in the conviction of the defendant;]
[(H)] (E) May disclose to any organization under contract with the
Judicial Department to provide family violence programs and services,
for the purpose of determining program and service needs, information
regarding any defendant who is a client of such organization, provided
no information that personally identifies the victim may be disclosed to
such organization; and
[(I)] (F) Shall disclose such information as may be necessary to fulfill
such counselor's, trainee's or supervisor's duty as a mandated reporter
under section 17a-101a to report suspected child abuse or neglect.
Sec. 6. Subsection (c) of section 46b-122 of the general statutes is
repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1,
2026):
(c) Any judge hearing a juvenile matter, in which a child is alleged to
Public Act No. 26-92 7 of 55

Substitute Senate Bill No. 475
be uncared for, neglected, abused or dependent or in which a child is
the subject of a petition for termination of parental rights, may permit
any person whom the court finds has a legitimate interest in the hearing
or the work of the court to attend such hearing. Such person may include
a party, foster parent, relative related to the child by [blood or marriage]
blood, marriage or law, service provider or any person or representative
of any agency, entity or association, including a representative of the
news media. The court may, for the child's safety and protection and for
good cause shown, prohibit any person or representative of any agency,
entity or association, including a representative of the news media, who
is present in court from further disclosing any information that would
identify the child, the custodian or caretaker of the child or the members
of the child's family involved in the hearing.
Sec. 7. Section 46b-129 of the 2026 supplement to the general statutes
is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July
1, 2026):
(a) Any selectman, town manager, or town, city or borough welfare
department, any probation officer, or the Commissioner of Social
Services, the Commissioner of Children and Families or any child-
caring institution or agency approved by the Commissioner of Children
and Families, a child or such child's representative or attorney or a foster
parent of a child, having information that a child or youth is neglected,
uncared for or abused may file with the Superior Court that has venue
over such matter a verified petition plainly stating such facts as bring
the child or youth within the jurisdiction of the court as neglected,
uncared for or abused within the meaning of section 46b-120, the name,
date of birth, sex and residence of the child or youth, the name and
residence of such child's parents or guardian, and praying for
appropriate action by the court in conformity with the provisions of this
chapter. Upon the filing of such a petition, except as otherwise provided
in subsection (k) of section 17a-112, the court shall cause a summons to
Public Act No. 26-92 8 of 55

Substitute Senate Bill No. 475
be issued requiring the parent or parents or the guardian of the child or
youth to appear in court at the time and place named, which summons
shall be served not less than fourteen days before the date of the hearing
in the manner prescribed by section 46b-128, and the court shall further
give notice to the petitioner and to the Commissioner of Children and
Families of the time and place when the petition is to be heard not less
than fourteen days prior to the hearing in question.
(b) If it appears from the specific allegations of the petition and other
verified affirmations of fact accompanying the petition and application,
or subsequent thereto, that there is reasonable cause to believe that (1)
the child or youth is suffering from serious physical illness or serious
physical injury or is in immediate physical danger from the child's or
youth's surroundings, and (2) as a result of said conditions, the child's
or youth's safety is endangered and immediate removal from such
surroundings is necessary to ensure the child's or youth's safety, the
court shall either (A) issue an order to the parents or other person
having responsibility for the care of the child or youth to appear at such
time as the court may designate to determine whether the court should
vest the child's or youth's temporary care and custody in a person
related to the child or youth by [blood or marriage] blood, marriage or
law or in some other person or suitable agency pending disposition of
the petition, or (B) issue an order ex parte vesting the child's or youth's
temporary care and custody in a person related to the child or youth by
[blood or marriage] blood, marriage or law or in some other person or
suitable agency. A preliminary hearing on any ex parte custody order
or order to appear issued by the court shall be held not later than ten
days after the issuance of such order. The service of such orders may be
made by any officer authorized by law to serve process, or by any
probation officer appointed in accordance with section 46b-123,
investigator from the Department of Administrative Services, state or
local police officer or indifferent person. Such orders shall include a
conspicuous notice to the respondent written in clear and simple
Public Act No. 26-92 9 of 55

Substitute Senate Bill No. 475
language containing at least the following information: (i) That the order
contains allegations that conditions in the home have endangered the
safety and welfare of the child or youth; (ii) that a hearing will be held
on the date on the form; (iii) that the hearing is the opportunity to
present the parents' position concerning the alleged facts; (iv) that an
attorney will be appointed for parents who cannot afford an attorney;
(v) that such parents may apply for a court-appointed attorney by going
in person to the court address on the form and are advised to go as soon
as possible in order for the attorney to prepare for the hearing; (vi) that
such parents, or a person having responsibility for the care and custody
of the child or youth, may request the Commissioner of Children and
Families to investigate placing the child or youth with a person related
to the child or youth by [blood or marriage] blood, marriage or law who
might serve as a licensed foster parent or temporary custodian for such
child or youth. The commissioner shall investigate any relative or
relatives proposed to serve as a licensed foster parent or temporary
custodian for such child or youth prior to the preliminary hearing and
provide a preliminary report to the court at such hearing as to such
relative's or relatives' suitability and any potential barriers to licensing
such relative or relatives as a foster parent or parents or granting
temporary custody of such child or youth to such relative or relatives;
and (vii) that if such parents have any questions concerning the case or
appointment of counsel, any such parent is advised to go to the court or
call the clerk's office at the court as soon as possible. Upon application
for appointed counsel, the court shall promptly determine eligibility
and, if the respondent is eligible, promptly appoint counsel. The
expense for any temporary care and custody shall be paid by the town
in which such child or youth is at the time residing, and such town shall
be reimbursed for such expense by the town found liable for the child's
or youth's support, except that where a state agency has filed a petition
pursuant to the provisions of subsection (a) of this section, the agency
shall pay such expense. The agency shall give primary consideration to
placing the child or youth in the town where such child or youth resides.
Public Act No. 26-92 10 of 55

Substitute Senate Bill No. 475
The agency shall file in writing with the clerk of the court the reasons
for placing the child or youth in a particular placement outside the town
where the child or youth resides. Upon issuance of an ex parte order,
the court shall provide to the commissioner and the parent or guardian
specific steps necessary for each to take to address the ex parte order for
the parent or guardian to retain or regain custody of the child or youth.
Upon the issuance of such order, or not later than sixty days after the
issuance of such order, the court shall make a determination whether
the Department of Children and Families made reasonable efforts to
keep the child or youth with his or her parents or guardian prior to the
issuance of such order and, if such efforts were not made, whether such
reasonable efforts were not possible, taking into consideration the
child's or youth's best interests, including the child's or youth's health
and safety. Any person or agency in which the temporary care and
custody of a child or youth is vested under this section shall have the
following rights and duties regarding the child or youth: (I) The
obligation of care and control; (II) the authority to make decisions
regarding emergency medical, psychological, psychiatric or surgical
treatment; and (III) such other rights and duties that the court having
jurisdiction may order.
(c) The preliminary hearing on the order of temporary custody or
order to appear or the first hearing on a petition filed pursuant to
subsection (a) of this section shall be held in order for the court to:
(1) Advise the parent or guardian of the allegations contained in all
petitions and applications that are the subject of the hearing and the
parent's or guardian's right to counsel pursuant to subsection (b) of
section 46b-135;
(2) Ensure that an attorney, and where appropriate, a separate
guardian ad litem has been appointed to represent the child or youth in
accordance with subsection (b) of section 51-296a and sections 46b-129a
and 46b-136;
Public Act No. 26-92 11 of 55

Substitute Senate Bill No. 475
(3) Upon request, appoint an attorney to represent the respondent
when the respondent is unable to afford representation, in accordance
with subsection (b) of section 51-296a;
(4) Advise the parent or guardian of the right to a hearing on the
petitions and applications, to be held not later than ten days after the
date of the preliminary hearing if the hearing is pursuant to an order of
temporary custody or an order to show cause;
(5) Accept a plea regarding the truth of the allegations;
(6) Make any interim orders, including visitation orders, that the
court determines are in the best interests of the child or youth. The court,
after a hearing pursuant to this subsection, shall order specific steps the
commissioner and the parent or guardian shall take for the parent or
guardian to regain or to retain custody of the child or youth;
(7) Take steps to determine the identity of the alleged genetic parent
of the child or youth, including, if necessary, inquiring of the birth
parent of the child or youth, under oath, as to the identity and address
of any person who might be the genetic parent of the child or youth and
ordering genetic testing, and order service of the petition and notice of
the hearing date, if any, to be made upon such alleged genetic parent;
(8) If the person named as the alleged genetic parent appears and
admits that such person is the genetic parent, provide such person and
the birth parent with the notices that comply with section 17b-27 and
provide them with the opportunity to sign an acknowledgment of
parentage on forms [that comply with section 17b-27. Such documents
shall be executed and filed in accordance with chapter 815y and a copy
delivered to the clerk of the superior court for juvenile matters. The clerk
of the superior court for juvenile matters shall send the original
acknowledgment of parentage to the Department of Public Health for
filing in the parentage registry maintained under section 19a-42a, and
Public Act No. 26-92 12 of 55

Substitute Senate Bill No. 475
shall maintain a copy of the acknowledgment of parentage in the court
file] prescribed by the Department of Public Health;
(9) If the person named as an alleged genetic parent appears and
denies that such person is the genetic parent of the child or youth, order
genetic testing to determine parentage in accordance with the
Connecticut Parentage Act. The clerk of the court shall send a certified
copy of any judgment adjudicating parentage to the Department of
Public Health for filing in the parentage registry maintained under
section 19a-42a. If the results of the genetic tests indicate that the person
named as the alleged genetic parent is not the genetic parent of the child
or youth, the court shall enter a judgment that such person is not the
genetic parent and the court shall remove such person from the case and
afford such person no further standing in the case or in any subsequent
proceeding regarding the child or youth;
(10) Identify any person or persons related to the child or youth by
blood, marriage or law residing in this state who might serve as licensed
foster parents or temporary custodians and order the Commissioner of
Children and Families to investigate and report to the court, not later
than thirty days after the preliminary hearing, the appropriateness of
placing the child or youth with such relative or relatives; and
(11) In accordance with the provisions of the Interstate Compact on
the Placement of Children pursuant to section 17a-175, identify any
person or persons related to the child or youth by blood, marriage or
law residing out of state who might serve as licensed foster parents or
temporary custodians, and order the Commissioner of Children and
Families to investigate and determine, within a reasonable time, the
appropriateness of placing the child or youth with such relative or
relatives.
(d) (1) (A) If not later than thirty days after the preliminary hearing,
or within a reasonable time when a relative resides out of state, the
Public Act No. 26-92 13 of 55

Substitute Senate Bill No. 475
Commissioner of Children and Families determines that there is not a
suitable person related to the child or youth by [blood or marriage]
blood, marriage or law who can be licensed as a foster parent or serve
as a temporary custodian, and the court has not granted temporary
custody to a person related to the child or youth by [blood or marriage]
blood, marriage or law, any person related to the child or youth by
[blood or marriage] blood, marriage or law may file, not later than
ninety days after the date of the preliminary hearing, a motion to
intervene for the limited purpose of moving for temporary custody of
such child or youth. If a motion to intervene is timely filed, the court
shall grant such motion except for good cause shown.
(B) Any person related to a child or youth may file a motion to
intervene for purposes of seeking temporary custody of a child or youth
more than ninety days after the date of the preliminary hearing. The
granting of such motion shall be solely in the court's discretion, except
that such motion shall be granted absent good cause shown whenever
the child's or youth's most recent placement has been disrupted or is
about to be disrupted.
(C) A relative shall appear in person, with or without counsel, and
shall not be entitled to court appointed counsel or the assignment of
counsel by the office of Chief Public Defender, except as provided in
section 46b-136.
(2) Upon the granting of intervenor status to such relative of the child
or youth, the court shall issue an order directing the Commissioner of
Children and Families to conduct an assessment of such relative and to
file a written report with the court not later than forty days after such
order, unless such relative resides out of state, in which case the
assessment shall be ordered and requested in accordance with the
provisions of the Interstate Compact on the Placement of Children,
pursuant to section 17a-175. The court may also request such relative to
release such relative's medical records, including any psychiatric or
Public Act No. 26-92 14 of 55

Substitute Senate Bill No. 475
psychological records and may order such relative to submit to a
physical or mental examination. The expenses incurred for such
physical or mental examination shall be paid as costs of commitment are
paid. Upon receipt of the assessment, the court shall schedule a hearing
on such relative's motion for temporary custody not later than fifteen
days after the receipt of the assessment. If the Commissioner of Children
and Families, the child's or youth's attorney or guardian ad litem, or the
parent or guardian objects to the vesting of temporary custody in such
relative, the agency or person objecting at such hearing shall be required
to prove by a fair preponderance of the evidence that granting
temporary custody of the child or youth to such relative would not be
in the best interests of such child or youth.
(3) If the court grants such relative temporary custody during the
period of such temporary custody, such relative shall be subject to
orders of the court, including, but not limited to, providing for the care
and supervision of such child or youth and cooperating with the
Commissioner of Children and Families in the implementation of
treatment and permanency plans and services for such child or youth.
The court may, on motion of any party or the court's own motion, after
notice and a hearing, terminate such relative's intervenor status if such
relative's participation in the case is no longer warranted or necessary.
(4) Any person related to a child or youth may file a motion to
intervene for purposes of seeking guardianship of a child or youth more
than ninety days after the date of the preliminary hearing. The granting
of such motion to intervene shall be solely in the court's discretion,
except that such motion shall be granted absent good cause shown
whenever the child's or youth's most recent placement has been
disrupted or is about to be disrupted. The court may, in the court's
discretion, order the Commissioner of Children and Families to conduct
an assessment of such relative granted intervenor status pursuant to this
subdivision.
Public Act No. 26-92 15 of 55

Substitute Senate Bill No. 475
(5) Any relative granted intervenor status pursuant to this subsection
shall not be entitled to court-appointed counsel or representation by
Division of Public Defender Services assigned counsel, except as
provided in section 46b-136.
(e) If any parent or guardian fails, after service of such order, to
appear at the preliminary hearing, the court may enter or sustain an
order of temporary custody.
(f) Upon request, or upon its own motion, the court shall schedule a
hearing on the order for temporary custody or the order to appear to be
held not later than ten days after the date of the preliminary hearing.
Such hearing shall be held on consecutive days except for compelling
circumstances or at the request of the parent or guardian.
(g) At a contested hearing on the order for temporary custody or
order to appear, credible hearsay evidence regarding statements of the
child or youth made to a mandated reporter or to a parent may be
offered by the parties and admitted by the court upon a finding that the
statement is reliable and trustworthy and that admission of such
statement is reasonably necessary. A signed statement executed by a
mandated reporter under oath may be admitted by the court without
the need for the mandated reporter to appear and testify unless called
by a respondent or the child, provided the statement: (1) Was provided
at the preliminary hearing and promptly upon request to any counsel
appearing after the preliminary hearing; (2) reasonably describes the
qualifications of the reporter and the nature of his contact with the child;
and (3) contains only the direct observations of the reporter, and
statements made to the reporter that would be admissible if the reporter
were to testify to them in court and any opinions reasonably based
thereupon. If a respondent or the child gives notice at the preliminary
hearing that he intends to cross-examine the reporter, the person filing
the petition shall make the reporter available for such examination at
the contested hearing.
Public Act No. 26-92 16 of 55

Substitute Senate Bill No. 475
(h) If any parent or guardian fails, after due notice of the hearing
scheduled pursuant to subsection (g) of this section and without good
cause, to appear at the scheduled date for a contested hearing on the
order of temporary custody or order to appear, the court may enter or
sustain an order of temporary custody.
(i) When a petition is filed in said court for the commitment of a child
or youth, the Commissioner of Children and Families shall make a
thorough investigation of the case and shall cause to be made a
thorough physical and mental examination of the child or youth if
requested by the court. The court after hearing may also order a
thorough physical or mental examination, or both, of a parent or
guardian whose competency or ability to care for a child or youth before
the court is at issue. The expenses incurred in making such physical and
mental examinations shall be paid as costs of commitment are paid.
(j) (1) For the purposes of this subsection and subsection (k) of this
section, (A) "permanent legal guardianship" means a permanent
guardianship, as defined in section 45a-604, (B) "caregiver" means (i) a
fictive kin caregiver, as defined in section 17a-114, who is caring for a
child, (ii) a relative caregiver, as defined in section 17a-126, who is caring
for a child, or (iii) a person who is licensed or approved to provide foster
care pursuant to section 17a-114, who is caring for a child, and (C) "trial
home visit" means the temporary placement of a child or youth
committed to the Commissioner of Children and Families in the home
of such child's or youth's parent or guardian.
(2) Upon finding and adjudging that any child or youth is uncared
for, neglected or abused the court may (A) commit such child or youth
to the Commissioner of Children and Families, and such commitment
shall remain in effect until further order of the court, except that such
commitment may be revoked or parental rights terminated at any time
by the court; (B) vest such child's or youth's legal guardianship in any
private or public agency that is permitted by law to care for neglected,
Public Act No. 26-92 17 of 55

Substitute Senate Bill No. 475
uncared for or abused children or youths or with any other person or
persons found to be suitable and worthy of such responsibility by the
court, including, but not limited to, any relative of such child or youth
by [blood or marriage] blood, marriage or law; (C) vest such child's or
youth's permanent legal guardianship in any person or persons found
to be suitable and worthy of such responsibility by the court, including,
but not limited to, any relative of such child or youth by [blood or
marriage] blood, marriage or law in accordance with the requirements
set forth in subdivision (6) of this subsection; or (D) place the child or
youth in the custody of the parent or guardian with protective
supervision by the Commissioner of Children and Families subject to
conditions established by the court. Upon issuing any order pursuant to
this section, the court shall order specific steps that the parent must take
to facilitate the return of the child or youth to the custody of such parent
or to maintain the child or youth in the parent's custody while under an
order of protective supervision.
(3) If the court approves a permanency plan filed with the court that
recommends the reunification of the child or youth with such child's or
youth's parent or guardian, the Commissioner of Children and Families
may, with the agreement of all parties of record, authorize a trial home
visit prior to the revocation of the order of commitment pertaining to
such child or youth. The commissioner shall (A) provide the court and
all parties of record written notice of the commissioner's intent to
authorize any such trial home visit not later than fifteen days prior to
such authorization; (B) create a trial home visit plan that shall be
provided to all parties of record, and include, but need not be limited to,
announced and unannounced visits to the home by the department and
the provision of any services during such trial home visit that the
commissioner determines are necessary to promote the child's or
youth's well-being; and (C) file a motion for revocation of commitment
not later than thirty days after the date such trial home visit commences,
unless the commissioner removes the child or youth from the home
Public Act No. 26-92 18 of 55

Substitute Senate Bill No. 475
prior to that time pursuant to its responsibility and authority over
children and youth committed to the care and custody of the
commissioner. A trial home visit authorized under this section shall
remain in effect until the commissioner removes such child or youth
pursuant to subparagraph (C) of this subdivision or the court grants a
motion for revocation of commitment filed pursuant to said
subparagraph.
(4) If the court determines that the commitment should be revoked
and the child's or youth's legal guardianship or permanent legal
guardianship should vest in someone other than the respondent parent,
parents or former guardian, or if parental rights are terminated at any
time, there shall be a rebuttable presumption that an award of legal
guardianship or permanent legal guardianship upon revocation to, or
adoption upon termination of parental rights by, any caregiver or
person or who is, pursuant to an order of the court, the temporary
custodian of the child or youth at the time of the revocation or
termination, shall be in the best interests of the child or youth and that
such caregiver is a suitable and worthy person to assume legal
guardianship or permanent legal guardianship upon revocation or to
adopt such child or youth upon termination of parental rights. The
presumption may be rebutted by a preponderance of the evidence that
an award of legal guardianship or permanent legal guardianship to, or
an adoption by, such caregiver would not be in the child's or youth's
best interests and such caregiver is not a suitable and worthy person.
[The court shall order specific steps that the parent must take to facilitate
the return of the child or youth to the custody of such parent.]
(5) The commissioner shall be the guardian of such child or youth for
the duration of the commitment, provided the child or youth has not
reached the age of eighteen years, or until another guardian has been
legally appointed, and in like manner, upon such vesting of the care of
such child or youth, such other public or private agency or individual
Public Act No. 26-92 19 of 55

Substitute Senate Bill No. 475
shall be the guardian of such child or youth until such child or youth
has reached the age of eighteen years or, in the case of a child or youth
in full-time attendance in a secondary school, a technical education and
career school, a college or a state-accredited job training program, until
such child or youth has reached the age of twenty-one years or until
another guardian has been legally appointed. The commissioner may
place any child or youth so committed to the commissioner in a suitable
foster home or in the home of a fictive kin caregiver, relative caregiver,
or in a licensed child-caring institution or in the care and custody of any
accredited, licensed or approved child-caring agency, within or without
the state, provided a child shall not be placed outside the state except
for good cause and unless the parent or guardian of such child are
notified in advance of such placement and given an opportunity to be
heard, or in a receiving home maintained and operated by the
commissioner. When placing such child or youth, the commissioner
shall provide written notification of the placement, including the name,
address and other relevant contact information relating to the
placement, to any attorney or guardian ad litem appointed to represent
the child or youth pursuant to subsection (c) of this section. The
commissioner shall provide written notification to such attorney or
guardian ad litem of any change in placement of such child or youth,
including a hospitalization or respite placement, and if the child or
youth absconds from care. The commissioner shall provide such written
notification not later than ten business days prior to the date of change
of placement in a nonemergency situation, or not later than two business
days following the date of a change of placement in an emergency
situation. In placing such child or youth, the commissioner shall, if
possible, select a home, agency, institution or person of like religious
faith to that of a parent of such child or youth, if such faith is known or
may be ascertained by reasonable inquiry, provided such home
conforms to the standards of the commissioner and the commissioner
shall, when placing siblings, if possible, place such children together. At
least ten days prior to transferring a child or youth to a second or
Public Act No. 26-92 20 of 55

Substitute Senate Bill No. 475
subsequent placement, the commissioner shall give written notice to
such child or youth and such child's or youth's attorney of said
commissioner's intention to make such transfer, unless an emergency or
risk to such child's or youth's well-being necessitates the immediate
transfer of such child or youth and renders such notice impossible.
Upon the issuance of an order committing the child or youth to the
commissioner, or not later than sixty days after the issuance of such
order, the court shall determine whether the department made
reasonable efforts to keep the child or youth with his or her parent or
guardian prior to the issuance of such order and, if such efforts were not
made, whether such reasonable efforts were not possible, taking into
consideration the child's or youth's best interests, including the child's
or youth's health and safety.
(6) (A) A youth who is committed to the commissioner pursuant to
this subsection and has reached eighteen years of age may remain in the
care of the commissioner, by consent of the youth and provided the
youth has not reached the age of twenty-one years of age, if the youth is
(i) enrolled in a full-time approved secondary education program or an
approved program leading to an equivalent credential; (ii) enrolled full
time in an institution which provides postsecondary or vocational
education; or (iii) participating full time in a program or activity
approved by said commissioner that is designed to promote or remove
barriers to employment. The commissioner, in the commissioner's
discretion, may waive the provision of full-time enrollment or
participation based on compelling circumstances. Not more than one
hundred twenty days after the youth's eighteenth birthday, the
department shall file a motion in the superior court for juvenile matters
that had jurisdiction over the youth's case prior to the youth's eighteenth
birthday for a determination as to whether continuation in care is in the
youth's best interest and, if so, whether there is an appropriate
permanency plan. The court, in its discretion, may hold a hearing on
said motion.
Public Act No. 26-92 21 of 55

Substitute Senate Bill No. 475
(B) Any youth who was committed to the commissioner pursuant to
this subsection and, having declined to consent to remain in the care of
the commissioner, left such care once such youth turned eighteen years
of age, may request, in a form and manner prescribed by the
commissioner, not later than sixty days prior to the date such youth
turns twenty-one years of age, to reenter into the care of the
commissioner. Upon receipt of such request, the commissioner shall
determine whether such youth meets the requirements described in
subparagraph (A) of this subdivision. If the commissioner determines
that such youth meets such requirements, the department may request
that such youth enter into a written agreement governing the terms of
his or her voluntary reentry into the care of the commissioner and
permit such youth to reenter care. Not more than sixty days after the
execution of such agreement, the commissioner shall file a motion in the
superior court for juvenile matters that had jurisdiction over the youth's
case prior to the youth's eighteenth birthday for a determination as to
whether reentry into care is in the youth's best interest and, if so,
whether there is an appropriate permanency plan. The court may hold
a hearing on said motion.
(7) Prior to issuing an order for permanent legal guardianship, the
court shall provide notice to each parent that the parent may not file a
motion to terminate the permanent legal guardianship, or the court shall
indicate on the record why such notice could not be provided, and the
court shall find by clear and convincing evidence that the permanent
legal guardianship is in the best interests of the child or youth and that
the following have been proven by clear and convincing evidence:
(A) One of the statutory grounds for termination of parental rights
exists, as set forth in subsection (j) of section 17a-112, or the parents have
voluntarily consented to the establishment of the permanent legal
guardianship;
(B) Adoption of the child or youth is not possible or appropriate;
Public Act No. 26-92 22 of 55

Substitute Senate Bill No. 475
(C) (i) If the child or youth is at least twelve years of age, such child
or youth consents to the proposed permanent legal guardianship, or (ii)
if the child is under twelve years of age, the proposed permanent legal
guardian is: (I) A relative, (II) a caregiver, or (III) already serving as the
permanent legal guardian of at least one of the child's siblings, if any;
(D) The child or youth has resided with the proposed permanent
legal guardian for at least a year; and
(E) The proposed permanent legal guardian is (i) a suitable and
worthy person, and (ii) committed to remaining the permanent legal
guardian and assuming the right and responsibilities for the child or
youth until the child or youth attains the age of majority.
(8) An order of permanent legal guardianship may be reopened and
modified and the permanent legal guardian removed upon the filing of
a motion with the court, provided it is proven by a fair preponderance
of the evidence that the permanent legal guardian is no longer suitable
and worthy. A parent may not file a motion to terminate a permanent
legal guardianship. If, after a hearing, the court terminates a permanent
legal guardianship, the court, in appointing a successor legal guardian
or permanent legal guardian for the child or youth shall do so in
accordance with this subsection.
(k) (1) (A) Nine months after placement of the child or youth in the
care and custody of the commissioner pursuant to a voluntary
placement agreement, or removal of a child or youth pursuant to section
17a-101g or an order issued by a court of competent jurisdiction,
whichever is earlier, the commissioner shall file a motion for review of
a permanency plan if the child or youth has not reached his or her
eighteenth birthday. Nine months after a permanency plan has been
approved by the court pursuant to this subsection or subdivision (5) of
subsection (j) of this section, the commissioner shall file a motion for
review of the permanency plan. Any party seeking to oppose the
Public Act No. 26-92 23 of 55

Substitute Senate Bill No. 475
commissioner's permanency plan, including a relative of a child or
youth by [blood or marriage] blood, marriage or law who has
intervened pursuant to subsection (d) of this section and is licensed as a
foster parent for such child or youth or is vested with such child's or
youth's temporary custody by order of the court, shall file a motion in
opposition not later than thirty days after the filing of the
commissioner's motion for review of the permanency plan, which
motion shall include the reason therefor. A permanency hearing on any
motion for review of the permanency plan shall be held not later than
ninety days after the filing of such motion. The court shall hold
evidentiary hearings in connection with any contested motion for
review of the permanency plan and credible hearsay evidence regarding
any party's compliance with specific steps ordered by the court shall be
admissible at such evidentiary hearings. The commissioner shall have
the burden of proving that the proposed permanency plan is in the best
interests of the child or youth. After the initial permanency hearing,
subsequent permanency hearings shall be held not less frequently than
every twelve months while the child or youth remains in the custody of
the Commissioner of Children and Families or, if the youth is over
eighteen years of age, while the youth remains in voluntary placement
with the department. The court shall provide notice to the child or
youth, the parent or guardian of such child or youth, and any intervenor
of the time and place of the court hearing on any such motion not less
than fourteen days prior to such hearing.
(B) (i) If a child is at least twelve years of age, the child's permanency
plan, and any revision to such plan, shall be developed in consultation
with the child. In developing or revising such plan, the child may
consult up to two individuals participating in the department's case
plan regarding such child, neither of whom shall be the foster parent or
caseworker of such child. One individual so selected by such child may
be designated as the child's advisor for purposes of developing or
revising the permanency plan. Regardless of the child's age, the
Public Act No. 26-92 24 of 55

Substitute Senate Bill No. 475
commissioner shall provide not less than five days' advance written
notice of any permanency team meeting concerning the child's
permanency plan to an attorney or guardian ad litem appointed to
represent the child pursuant to subsection (c) of this section.
(ii) If a child is at least twelve years of age, the commissioner shall
notify the parent or guardian, foster parent and child of any
administrative case review regarding such child's commitment not less
than five days prior to such review and shall make a reasonable effort
to schedule such review at a time and location that allows the parent or
guardian, foster parent and child to attend.
(iii) If a child is at least twelve years of age, such child shall, whenever
possible, identify not more than three adults with whom such child has
a significant relationship and who may serve as a permanency resource.
The identity of such adults shall be recorded in the case plan of such
child.
(2) At a permanency hearing held in accordance with the provisions
of subdivision (1) of this subsection, the court shall approve a
permanency plan that is in the best interests of the child or youth and
takes into consideration the child's or youth's need for permanency. The
child's or youth's health and safety shall be of paramount concern in
formulating such plan. Such permanency plan may include the goal of
(A) revocation of commitment and reunification of the child or youth
with the parent or guardian, with or without protective supervision; (B)
transfer of guardianship or permanent legal guardianship; (C) filing of
termination of parental rights and adoption; or (D) for a child sixteen
years of age or older, another planned permanent living arrangement
ordered by the court, provided the Commissioner of Children and
Families has documented a compelling reason why it would not be in
the best interests of the child or youth for the permanency plan to
include the goals in subparagraphs (A) to (C), inclusive, of this
subdivision. Such other planned permanent living arrangement shall,
Public Act No. 26-92 25 of 55

Substitute Senate Bill No. 475
whenever possible, include an adult who has a significant relationship
with the child, and who is willing to be a permanency resource, and may
include, but not be limited to, placement of a youth in an independent
living program or long term foster care with an identified foster parent.
(3) If the permanency plan for a child sixteen years of age or older
includes the goal of another planned permanent living arrangement
pursuant to subparagraph (D) of subdivision (2) of this subsection or
subdivision (3) of subsection (c) of section 17a-111b, the department
shall document for the court: (A) The manner and frequency of efforts
made by the department to return the child home or to secure placement
for the child with a fit and willing relative, legal guardian or adoptive
parent; and (B) the steps the department has taken to ensure (i) the
child's foster family home or child care institution is following a
reasonable and prudent parent standard, as defined in section 17a-114d;
and (ii) the child has regular opportunities to engage in age appropriate
and developmentally appropriate activities, as defined in section 17a-
114d.
(4) At a permanency hearing held in accordance with the provisions
of subdivision (1) of this subsection, the court shall (A) (i) ask the child
or youth about his or her desired permanency outcome, or (ii) if the child
or youth is unavailable to appear at such hearing, require the attorney
for the child or youth to consult with the child or youth regarding the
child's or youth's desired permanency outcome and report the same to
the court, (B) review the status of the child or youth, (C) review the
progress being made to implement the permanency plan, (D) determine
a timetable for attaining the permanency plan, (E) determine the
services to be provided to the parent if the court approves a permanency
plan of reunification and the timetable for such services, and (F)
determine whether the commissioner has made reasonable efforts to
achieve the permanency plan. The court may revoke commitment if a
cause for commitment no longer exists and it is in the best interests of
Public Act No. 26-92 26 of 55

Substitute Senate Bill No. 475
the child or youth.
(5) If the permanency plan for a child sixteen years of age or older
includes the goal of another planned permanent living arrangement
pursuant to subparagraph (D) of subdivision (2) of this subsection, the
court shall (A) (i) ask the child about his or her desired permanency
outcome, or (ii) if the child is unavailable to appear at a permanency
hearing held in accordance with the provisions of subdivision (1) of this
subsection, require the attorney for the child to consult with the child
regarding the child's desired permanency outcome and report the same
to the court; (B) make a judicial determination that, as of the date of
hearing, another planned permanent living arrangement is the best
permanency plan for the child; and (C) document the compelling
reasons why it is not in the best interest of the child to return home or
to be placed with a fit and willing relative, legal guardian or adoptive
parent.
(6) If the court approves the permanency plan of adoption: (A) The
Commissioner of Children and Families shall file a petition for
termination of parental rights not later than sixty days after such
approval if such petition has not previously been filed; (B) the
commissioner may conduct a thorough adoption assessment and child-
specific recruitment; and (C) the court may order that the child be photo-
listed within thirty days if the court determines that such photo-listing
is in the best interests of the child or youth. As used in this subdivision,
"thorough adoption assessment" means conducting and documenting
face-to-face interviews with the child or youth, foster care providers and
other significant parties and "child specific recruitment" means
recruiting an adoptive placement targeted to meet the individual needs
of the specific child or youth, including, but not limited to, use of the
media, use of photo-listing services and any other in-state or out-of-state
resources that may be used to meet the specific needs of the child or
youth, unless there are extenuating circumstances that indicate that
Public Act No. 26-92 27 of 55

Substitute Senate Bill No. 475
such efforts are not in the best interests of the child or youth.
(l) The Commissioner of Children and Families shall pay directly to
the person or persons furnishing goods or services determined by said
commissioner to be necessary for the care and maintenance of such child
or youth the reasonable expense thereof, payment to be made at
intervals determined by said commissioner; and the Comptroller shall
draw his or her order on the Treasurer, from time to time, for such part
of the appropriation for care of committed children or youths as may be
needed in order to enable the commissioner to make such payments.
The commissioner shall include in the department's annual budget a
sum estimated to be sufficient to carry out the provisions of this section.
Notwithstanding that any such child or youth has income or estate, the
commissioner may pay the cost of care and maintenance of such child
or youth. The commissioner may bill to and collect from the person in
charge of the estate of any child or youth aided under this chapter, or
the payee of such child's or youth's income, the total amount expended
for care of such child or youth or such portion thereof as any such estate
or payee is able to reimburse, provided the commissioner shall not
collect from such estate or payee any reimbursement for the cost of care
or other expenditures made on behalf of such child or youth from (1) the
proceeds of any cause of action received by such child or youth; (2) any
lottery proceeds due to such child or youth; (3) any inheritance due to
such child or youth; (4) any payment due to such child or youth from a
trust other than a trust created pursuant to 42 USC 1396p, as amended
from time to time; or (5) the decedent estate of such child or youth.
(m) The commissioner, a parent or the child's attorney may file a
motion to revoke a commitment, and, upon finding that cause for
commitment no longer exists, and that such revocation is in the best
interests of such child or youth, the court may revoke the commitment
of such child or youth. No such motion shall be filed more often than
once every six months.
Public Act No. 26-92 28 of 55

Substitute Senate Bill No. 475
(n) If the court has ordered legal guardianship of a child or youth to
be vested in a suitable and worthy person pursuant to subsection (j) of
this section, the child's or youth's parent or former legal guardian may
file a motion to reinstate guardianship of the child or youth in such
parent or former legal guardian. Upon the filing of such a motion, the
court may order the Commissioner of Children and Families to
investigate the home conditions and needs of the child or youth and the
home conditions of the person seeking reinstatement of guardianship,
and to make a recommendation to the court. A party to a motion for
reinstatement of guardianship shall not be entitled to court-appointed
counsel or representation by Division of Public Defender Services
assigned counsel, except as provided in section 46b-136. Upon finding
that the cause for the removal of guardianship no longer exists, and that
reinstatement is in the best interests of the child or youth, the court may
reinstate the guardianship of the parent or the former legal guardian.
No such motion may be filed more often than once every six months.
(o) Upon service on the parent, guardian or other person having
control of the child or youth of any order issued by the court pursuant
to the provisions of subsections (b) and (j) of this section, the child or
youth concerned shall be surrendered to the person serving the order
who shall forthwith deliver the child or youth to the person, agency,
department or institution awarded custody in the order. Upon refusal
of the parent, guardian or other person having control of the child or
youth to surrender the child or youth as provided in the order, the court
may cause a warrant to be issued charging the parent, guardian or other
person having control of the child or youth with contempt of court. If
the person arrested is found in contempt of court, the court may order
such person confined until the person complies with the order, but for
not more than six months, or may fine such person not more than five
hundred dollars, or both.
(p) A foster parent, prospective adoptive parent or relative caregiver
Public Act No. 26-92 29 of 55

Substitute Senate Bill No. 475
shall receive notice and have the right to be heard for the purposes of
this section in Superior Court in any proceeding concerning a foster
child living with such foster parent, prospective adoptive parent or
relative caregiver. A foster parent, prospective adoptive parent or
relative caregiver who has cared for a child or youth shall have the right
to be heard and comment on the best interests of such child or youth in
any proceeding under this section which is brought not more than one
year after the last day the foster parent, prospective adoptive parent or
relative caregiver provided such care. Any notice provided pursuant to
this subsection shall include the Internet web site address for any
proceeding that will be conducted on a virtual platform. The court shall
confirm compliance with the notice requirements set forth in this
subsection at any such proceeding.
(q) Upon motion of any sibling of any child committed to the
Department of Children and Families pursuant to this section, such
sibling shall have the right to be heard concerning visitation with, and
placement of, any such child. In awarding any visitation or modifying
any placement, the court shall be guided by the best interests of all
siblings affected by such determination.
(r) The provisions of section 17a-152, regarding placement of a child
or youth from another state, and section 17a-175, regarding the
Interstate Compact on the Placement of Children, shall apply to
placements pursuant to this section. In any proceeding under this
section involving the placement of a child or youth in another state
where the provisions of section 17a-175 are applicable, the court shall,
before ordering or approving such placement, state for the record the
court's finding concerning compliance with the provisions of section
17a-175. The court's statement shall include, but not be limited to: (1) A
finding that the state has received notice in writing from the receiving
state, in accordance with subsection (d) of Article III of section 17a-175,
indicating that the proposed placement does not appear contrary to the
Public Act No. 26-92 30 of 55

Substitute Senate Bill No. 475
interests of the child or youth, (2) the court has reviewed such notice, (3)
whether or not an interstate compact study or other home study has
been completed by the receiving state, and (4) if such a study has been
completed, whether the conclusions reached by the receiving state as a
result of such study support the placement.
(s) In any proceeding under this section, the Department of Children
and Families shall provide notice to (1) each attorney of record for each
party involved in the proceeding when the department seeks to transfer
a child or youth in its care, custody or control to an out-of-state
placement, and (2) the attorney for the child or youth, and any guardian
ad litem for such child or youth, of (A) any new report of abuse or
neglect pertaining to such child or youth or such child's or youth's
parent or guardian received pursuant to section 17a-103a, (B) whether
such report resulted in an investigation, and (C) the results of any such
investigation.
(t) If a child or youth is placed into out-of-home care by the
Commissioner of Children and Families pursuant to this section, the
commissioner shall include in any report the commissioner submits to
the court information regarding (1) the safety and suitability of such
child's or youth's placement, taking into account the requirements set
forth in section 17a-114; (2) whether the department has received or
obtained the most recent information concerning such child's or youth's
medical, dental, developmental, educational and treatment needs from
any relevant service providers; (3) a timeline for ensuring that such
needs are met; (4) for any such child or youth under three years of age,
whether the child or youth was screened for developmental and social-
emotional delays pursuant to section 17a-106e, whether any such delays
were identified and, if so, whether the child or youth was referred to the
birth-to-three program pursuant to said section; (5) the dates of
administrative case review meetings and permanency team meetings;
(6) any new report alleging abuse or neglect pertaining to such child or
Public Act No. 26-92 31 of 55

Substitute Senate Bill No. 475
youth or a parent or guardian of such child or youth pursuant to section
17a-103a, and (A) whether such report resulted in an investigation, and
(B) the findings of any such investigation; and (7) any new criminal
charges pending against any such parent or guardian. Such information
shall also be submitted to the court (A) not later than ninety days after
such child or youth is placed into out-of-home care; (B) if such child's or
youth's out-of-home placement changes; and (C) if the commissioner
files a permanency plan on behalf of such child or youth. The court shall
consider such information in making decisions regarding such child's or
youth's best interests.
(u) Prior to the issuance of any order affecting the legal status or
placement of a child in any proceeding under this section, the court shall
confirm that (1) any attorney for such child has obtained a clear
understanding of the situation and the needs of such child, as described
in 42 USC 5106a(b)(2)(B), as amended from time to time; (2) any
guardian ad litem for such child has performed an independent
investigation of the case and is prepared to present information
pertinent to the court's determination of the best interests of such child,
in accordance with the provisions of subparagraph (D) of subdivision
(2) of section 46b-129a; and (3) any attorney or guardian ad litem for
such child has (A) communicated regularly with such child, or, in the
case of a nonverbal child, such child's caregivers and service providers,
and (B) visited with such child with sufficient frequency as to be
informed of such child's situation and needs.
(v) In any proceeding to review, modify, terminate or extend an order
of protective supervision, the Department of Children and Families
shall file with the court information concerning (1) whether the
department has received or obtained the most up-to-date information
concerning the child's medical, dental, developmental, educational and
treatment needs from any relevant service providers; (2) whether the
child has received services recommended by any such providers and a
Public Act No. 26-92 32 of 55

Substitute Senate Bill No. 475
description of any concerns identified by such providers; (3) a
description of (A) any new report alleging abuse or neglect pertaining
to the child or a parent or guardian of the child received pursuant to
section 17a-103a, (B) whether such report resulted in an investigation,
and (C) the findings of any such investigation; (4) any new criminal
charges pending against any such parent or guardian; and (5) for any
child under three years of age, whether the child was screened for
developmental and social-emotional delays pursuant to section 17a-
106e, whether any such delays were identified and, if so, whether the
child was referred to the birth-to-three program pursuant to said
section.
(w) In any proceeding under this section, the Department of Children
and Families shall identify the source of any documentation, statements
or allegations included in the department's submissions to the court and
the date or dates upon which any such information was obtained by the
department.
Sec. 8. Section 46b-145 of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
No child shall be prosecuted for an offense before the regular criminal
docket of the Superior Court except as provided in section 46b-127,
[and] subsection (f) of section 46b-133c and subsection (f) of section 46b-
133d.
Sec. 9. Section 51-286f of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
The prosecuting official in a criminal proceeding shall request [on the
record] that a transcript be prepared of any sentencing hearing at which
a defendant is sentenced to a definite, nonsuspended sentence of more
than two years imprisonment. The Chief Court Administrator shall
provide, in a format prescribed by the Chief Court Administrator, any
Public Act No. 26-92 33 of 55

Substitute Senate Bill No. 475
such transcript to the Board of Pardons and Paroles.
Sec. 10. Section 52-146v of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
(a) As used in this section:
(1) "Peer support team member" means any person engaged in
directing or staffing any peer support program established by an
employer for the benefit of an employee who is a first responder;
(2) "First responder" means: Any peace officer, as defined in section
53a-3; any firefighter, as defined in section 7-313g; any person employed
as a firefighter by a private employer; any ambulance driver, emergency
medical responder, emergency medical technician, advanced
emergency medical technician or paramedic, as defined in section 19a-
175; any telecommunicator, as defined in section 28-30; and any
employee of the Department of Correction; and
(3) "Confidential communications" means all oral and written
communications transmitted in confidence between a first responder
and a peer support team member in the course of participation in an
employer established peer support program and all records prepared
by a peer support team member related to such first responder's
participation in such program.
(b) Except as provided in subsection (d) of this section, and unless the
first responder making the confidential communication waives the
privilege, no peer support team member shall disclose any confidential
communications (1) to any third person, other than a person to whom
disclosure is reasonably necessary for the accomplishment of the
purposes for which such member is consulted, (2) in any civil or
criminal case or proceeding, or (3) in any legislative or administrative
proceeding.
Public Act No. 26-92 34 of 55

Substitute Senate Bill No. 475
(c) No person in any civil or criminal case or proceeding or in any
legislative or administrative proceeding may request or require
information from any first responder relating to the first responder's
participation in a peer support program, including whether or not such
first responder at any time participated in such peer support program.
(d) Consent of a first responder shall not be required for the
disclosure of such first responder's confidential communications:
(1) Where mandated by any other provision of the general statutes;
(2) Where a peer support team member believes in good faith that the
failure to disclose such confidential communications presents a clear
and present danger to any individual, including the first responder; and
(3) Where the peer support team member was a witness or party to
an incident that resulted in the delivery of peer support services to the
first responder.
(e) (1) A peer support team member shall not be liable for damages
for any act, error or omission, not wanton, reckless or malicious,
committed by the peer support team or peer support team member in
performing peer support services for the benefit of an employee who is
a first responder.
(2) An employer shall not be liable for damages arising out of the
establishment or maintenance of a peer support program established by
such employer for the benefit of an employee who is a first responder.
(3) As used in this subsection, "performing peer support services"
includes, but is not limited to, the determination of whether disclosure
of a first responder's confidential communications is appropriate
pursuant to subsection (d) of this section.
Sec. 11. Subsection (f) of section 51-44a of the 2026 supplement to the
Public Act No. 26-92 35 of 55

Substitute Senate Bill No. 475
general statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(f) Except as provided in subsection (e) of this section, the commission
shall seek qualified candidates for consideration by the Governor for
nomination as judges for the Superior Court, Appellate Court and
Supreme Court. The commission shall adopt regulations, in accordance
with the provisions of chapter 54, concerning criteria by which to
evaluate the qualifications of candidates, including incumbent judges
who seek appointment to a different court. The commission shall
investigate and interview the candidates, including incumbent judges
seeking appointment to a different court. In the event the commission
issues a decision informing a candidate that the candidate will not be
considered by the Governor for nomination as a judge or informing an
incumbent judge that such judge will not be considered by the Governor
for appointment to a different court, such candidate or judge may
request from the commission a brief summary that informs the
candidate or judge of the reasons supporting such decision. The form
and manner of such summary shall be determined by the commission.
A list of such qualified candidates shall be compiled by the commission.
On or before January first of each year, the commission shall submit the
list of incumbent judges and qualified candidates to the Governor, the
president pro tempore of the Senate, the speaker of the House of
Representatives, the majority and minority leaders of both houses of the
General Assembly and the chairpersons and ranking members of the
joint standing committee of the General Assembly having cognizance of
matters relating to the judiciary. In accordance with the provisions of
subsection (j) of this section, such list shall be confidential and not open
to the public or subject to disclosure.
Sec. 12. Subsections (d) and (e) of section 54-56l of the general statutes
are repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective
October 1, 2026):
Public Act No. 26-92 36 of 55

Substitute Senate Bill No. 475
(d) The court shall refer such person to the Court Support Services
Division for confirmation of eligibility and assessment of the person's
mental health condition. If such person resides outside of the State of
Connecticut, such person shall return to the State of Connecticut as
instructed by the division for assessment of such person's mental health
condition. The prosecuting attorney shall provide the division with a
copy of the police report in the case to assist the division in its
assessment. The division shall determine if the person is amenable to
treatment and if appropriate community supervision, treatment and
services are available. If the division determines that the person is
amenable to treatment and that appropriate community supervision,
treatment and services are available, the division shall develop a
treatment plan tailored to the person and shall present the treatment
plan to the court.
(e) Upon confirmation of eligibility and consideration of the
treatment plan presented by the Court Support Services Division, the
court may grant the application for participation in the program. If the
court grants the application, such person shall be referred to the
division. The division may collaborate with the Department of Mental
Health and Addiction Services, the Department of Veterans Affairs or
the United States Department of Veterans Affairs, as applicable, to place
such person in a program that provides appropriate community
supervision, treatment and services. The person shall be (1) subject to
the supervision of a probation officer who has a reduced caseload and
specialized training in working with persons with psychiatric
disabilities, and (2) classified for purposes of supervision and
monitoring standards pursuant to section 54-108b.
Sec. 13. Subsection (k) of section 54-56l of the general statutes is
repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October
1, 2026):
(k) The Court Support Services Division [, in consultation] may
Public Act No. 26-92 37 of 55

Substitute Senate Bill No. 475
consult with the Department of Mental Health and Addiction Services
[, shall] to develop standards and oversee appropriate treatment
programs to meet the requirements of this section and may contract
with service providers to provide such programs.
Sec. 14. Subsection (b) of section 46b-133 of the general statutes is
repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October
1, 2026):
(b) Whenever a child is brought before a judge of the Superior Court,
which court shall be the court that has jurisdiction over juvenile matters
where the child resides if the residence of such child can be determined,
such judge shall immediately have the case proceeded upon as a
juvenile matter. Such judge may admit the child to bail or release the
child in the custody of the child's parent or parents, the child's guardian
or some other suitable person to appear before the Superior Court when
ordered. If there is probable cause to believe that the child has
committed the acts alleged, the court may [consider if the child should
be assessed for services] order a risk and needs assessment to determine
whether the child could benefit from services. Any such risk and needs
assessment shall be subject to the protections of subsection (k) of section
46b-124. Such assessment shall be held not later than two weeks after
the child is arraigned and such child shall have the right to counsel at
such assessment. If detention becomes necessary, such detention shall
be in the manner prescribed by this chapter, provided the child shall be
placed in the least restrictive environment possible in a manner
consistent with public safety.
Sec. 15. Subsection (o) of section 46b-121n of the 2026 supplement to
the general statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(o) Not later than January 1, 2019, and annually thereafter, the
Department of Correction [and the Court Support Services Division of
Public Act No. 26-92 38 of 55

Substitute Senate Bill No. 475
the Judicial Branch] shall report to the committee on compliance with
the provisions of section 46b-126a. Such reports shall present indicia of
compliance in both state facilities and those facilities managed by a
private provider under contract with the state, and shall include data on
all persons under eighteen years of age who have been removed or
excluded from educational settings as a result of alleged behavior
occurring in those educational settings.
Sec. 16. Subsection (g) of section 10-253 of the general statutes is
repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective January
1, 2027):
(g) (1) For purposes of this subsection, "juvenile residential center"
means a juvenile residential center operated by, or under contract with,
the Judicial Department.
(2) The local or regional board of education for the school district in
which a juvenile residential center is located shall be responsible for the
provision of general education and special education and related
services to children detained in such center. The provision of general
education and special education and related services shall be in
accordance with all applicable state and federal laws concerning the
provision of educational services. Such board may provide such
educational services directly or may contract with public or private
educational service providers for the provision of such services. Tuition
may be charged to the local or regional board of education under whose
jurisdiction the child would otherwise be attending school for the
provision of general education and special education and related
services. Responsibility for the provision of educational services to the
child shall begin on the date of the child's placement in the juvenile
residential center and financial responsibility for the provision of such
services shall begin upon the receipt by the child of such services.
(3) The local or regional board of education under whose jurisdiction
Public Act No. 26-92 39 of 55

Substitute Senate Bill No. 475
the child would otherwise be attending school or, if no such board can
be identified, the local or regional board of education for the school
district in which the juvenile residential center is located shall be
financially responsible for the tuition charged for the provision of
educational services to the child in such juvenile residential center. The
State Board of Education shall pay, on a current basis, any costs in excess
of such local or regional board of education's prior year's average per
pupil costs. If the local or regional board of education under whose
jurisdiction the child would otherwise be attending school cannot be
identified, the local or regional board of education for the school district
in which the juvenile residential center is located shall be eligible to
receive on a current basis from the State Board of Education any costs in
excess of such local or regional board of education's prior year's average
per pupil costs. Application for the grant to be paid by the state for costs
in excess of the local or regional board of education's basic contribution
shall be made in accordance with the provisions of subdivision (5) of
subsection (e) of section 10-76d.
(4) The local or regional board of education under whose jurisdiction
the child would otherwise be attending school shall be financially
responsible for the provision of educational services to the child placed
in a juvenile residential center as provided in subdivision (3) of this
subsection notwithstanding that the child has been suspended from
school pursuant to section 10-233c, has been expelled from school
pursuant to section 10-233d or has withdrawn, dropped out or
otherwise terminated enrollment from school. Upon notification of such
board of education by the educational services provider for the juvenile
residential center, the child shall be reenrolled in the school district
where the child would otherwise be attending school or, if no such
district can be identified, in the school district in which the juvenile
residential center is located, and provided with educational services in
accordance with the provisions of this subsection.
Public Act No. 26-92 40 of 55

Substitute Senate Bill No. 475
(5) The local or regional board of education under whose jurisdiction
the child would otherwise be attending school or, if no such board can
be identified, the local or regional board of education for the school
district in which the juvenile residential center is located shall be
notified [in writing by the Judicial Branch of the child's placement at the
juvenile residential center not later than one business day after the
child's placement, notwithstanding any provision of the general
statutes] of the child's placement at the juvenile residential center in
writing by the Commissioner of Children and Families in accordance
with section 10-220h. The notification shall include the child's name and
date of birth, the address of the child's parents or guardian, placement
location and contact information, and such other information as is
necessary to provide educational services to the child.
(6) Notwithstanding any provision of the general statutes, a child
who is enrolled in a school district at the time of placement in a juvenile
residential center shall remain enrolled in that same school district for
the duration of his or her detention, unless the child voluntarily
terminates enrollment, and shall have the right to return to such school
district immediately upon discharge from the juvenile residential center
into the community.
(7) When a child is not enrolled in a school at the time of placement
in a juvenile residential center:
(A) The child shall be enrolled in the school district where the child
would otherwise be attending school not later than three business days
after notification is given pursuant to subdivision (4) of this subsection.
(B) If no such district can be identified, the child shall be enrolled in
the school district in which the juvenile residential center is located not
later than three business days after the determination is made that no
such district can be identified.
Public Act No. 26-92 41 of 55

Substitute Senate Bill No. 475
(8) Upon learning that a child is to be discharged from a juvenile
residential center, the educational services provider for the juvenile
residential center shall immediately notify the jurisdiction in which the
child will continue his or her education after discharge from the juvenile
residential center.
(9) Prior to the child's discharge from the juvenile residential center,
the local or regional board of education responsible for the provision of
educational services to children in the juvenile residential center shall
conduct an assessment of the school work completed by the child to
determine an assignment of academic credit for the work completed.
Credit assigned shall be the credit of the local or regional board of
education responsible for the provision of the educational services.
Credit assigned for work completed by the child shall be accepted in
transfer by the local or regional board of education for the school district
in which the child continues his or her education after discharge from
the juvenile residential center.
Sec. 17. Section 47-31a of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(a) A person, as defined in section 42a-1-201, who has been identified
in a filing pursuant to chapters 821 to 822, inclusive, may petition the
Tax and Administrative Appeals Session of the Superior Court to
invalidate such filing, or any amendment thereof, when such filing was
falsely filed or amended. The court shall review such petition and
determine whether cause exists to doubt the validity of such filing or
amendment. Upon a determination that such cause exists, the court
[shall] may, not later than sixty days after the date of such
determination, hold a hearing to determine whether to invalidate such
filing or amendment or grant any other relief deemed appropriate by
the court. There shall be no fee to petition for a hearing under this
section. The court's finding may be made solely on a review of the
documentation attached to the petition and the responses, if any, of the
Public Act No. 26-92 42 of 55

Substitute Senate Bill No. 475
person named as a lienor on the land records and without hearing any
oral testimony, if none is offered by the lienor. The person petitioning
the court to invalidate a filing shall send a copy of such petition to all
parties named in such filing.
(b) A person who files a petition under subsection (a) of this section
shall include, as part of such petition, a certified copy of the filing, and
any amendment thereof, that such person seeks to invalidate.
(c) In determining whether cause exists to doubt the validity of a
filing or amendment under subsection (a) of this section, the court may
consider factors that include, but are not limited to, whether (1) the filing
or amendment is related to a valid existing commercial, financial or real
estate transaction, or a potential commercial, financial or real estate
transaction, or a judgment of a court of competent jurisdiction; (2) the
same individual is named as both debtor and creditor; (3) an individual
is named as a transmitting utility; and (4) the filing or amendment has
been filed with the intent to defraud, deceive, injure or harass a person,
business or governmental entity.
(d) If the court determines [after a hearing] that a filing identified in
a petition filed pursuant to subsection (a) of this section is not valid, the
court shall render a judgment that such filing is void in its entirety and
shall direct the custodian of such filing, when feasible, to note that such
filing is not valid. The court may grant such other relief as it deems
appropriate. The petitioner under subsection (a) of this section shall
provide a copy of the petition and the judgment of the court granting
such petition to the custodian of the filing adjudged invalid by the court.
Sec. 18. (NEW) (Effective July 1, 2026) The official seal of the
Connecticut Judicial Branch, or imitation thereof, whether as a
reproduction, imprint or facsimile, shall be made and used only under
the direction and with the approval of the Office of the Chief Court
Administrator for purposes specifically authorized by the Constitution
Public Act No. 26-92 43 of 55

Substitute Senate Bill No. 475
and laws of the state or related directly or indirectly to the official
business of the Judicial Branch, provided the Chief Court Administrator
may in the administrator's judgment approve other reproductions of
said seal for educational purposes as determined by the administrator.
Sec. 19. Section 54-207a of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
The Office of the Chief Court Administrator or the Chief Court
Administrator's designee shall prescribe such policies and procedures,
as deemed necessary, to implement the provisions of sections 54-201 to
54-235, inclusive, as amended by this act, and sections 19a-112e to 19a-
112g, inclusive, and may formulate standards for the uniform
application of the payment of compensation of claims.
Sec. 20. Section 54-201 of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
As used in sections 54-201 to 54-235, inclusive:
(1) "Victim" means a person who is injured or killed as provided in
section 54-209;
(2) "Personal injury" means (A) actual bodily harm or emotional harm
and includes pregnancy and any condition thereof, or (B) injury or death
to a service animal, as defined in 28 CFR 35.104, as amended from time
to time, owned or kept by a person with a disability;
(3) "Dependent" means any relative of a deceased victim or a person
designated by a deceased victim in accordance with section 1-56r who
was wholly or partially dependent upon his income at the time of his
death or the child of a deceased victim and shall include the child of
such victim born after his death;
(4) "Relative" means a person's spouse, parent, grandparent,
Public Act No. 26-92 44 of 55

Substitute Senate Bill No. 475
stepparent, aunt, uncle, niece, nephew, child, including a natural born
child, stepchild and adopted child, grandchild, brother, sister, half
brother or half sister or a parent of a person's spouse;
(5) "Crime" means any act which is a felony, as defined in section 53a-
25, or misdemeanor, as defined in section 53a-26, and includes any crime
committed by a juvenile;
(6) "Emotional harm" means a mental or emotional impairment that
is (A) directly attributable to a threat of [(A)] (i) physical injury, as
defined in subdivision (3) of section 53a-3, or [(B)] (ii) death to the
affected person, or (B) caused by the intentional or knowing actions of
another person, and such actions would cause a reasonable person to
fear for such person's safety; and
(7) "Disability" has the same meaning as provided in section 22-345.
Sec. 21. Section 46b-224 of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(a) Whenever the Probate Court, in a guardianship matter under
chapter 802h, or the Superior Court, in a family relations matter, as
defined in section 46b-1, orders a change or transfer of the guardianship
or custody of a child who is the subject of a preexisting support order,
and the court makes no finding with respect to such support order, such
guardianship or custody order shall operate to: (1) Suspend the support
order if guardianship or custody is transferred to the obligor under the
support order; or (2) modify the payee of the support order to be the
person or entity awarded guardianship or custody of the child by the
court, if such person or entity is other than the obligor under the support
order.
(b) Whenever the parties to a preexisting support order later
intermarry, such marriage shall operate to terminate the support order,
and the parties shall be jointly liable for ongoing support pursuant to
Public Act No. 26-92 45 of 55

Substitute Senate Bill No. 475
section 46b-37.
Sec. 22. (Effective from passage) Not later than October 1, 2026, the
Secretary of the State shall update the official compilation of the
regulations of Connecticut state agencies posted on the eRegulations
System in conformity with the provisions of section 4-168 of the general
statutes and section 23 of this act.
Sec. 23. (NEW) (Effective from passage) Notwithstanding the provisions
of chapter 54 of the general statutes, sections 11-10b-1 to 11-10b-5,
inclusive, of the regulations of Connecticut state agencies are repealed.
Sec. 24. Section 52-407kk of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
(a) If the parties to an agreement to arbitrate agree on a method for
appointing an arbitrator, that method must be followed, unless the
method fails. If the parties have not agreed on a method, the agreed
method fails or an appointed arbitrator fails or is unable to act and a
successor has not been appointed, the court, on motion of a party to the
arbitration proceeding, shall appoint the arbitrator. An arbitrator so
appointed has all the powers of an arbitrator designated in the
agreement to arbitrate or appointed pursuant to the agreed method.
(b) An individual who has a known, direct and material interest in
the outcome of the arbitration proceeding or a known, existing and
substantial relationship with a party may not serve as an arbitrator
required by an agreement to be neutral.
(c) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (a) of this section,
when an agreement to arbitrate includes the method for selecting an
arbitrator for an arbitration proceeding to be conducted in this state, no
person may be appointed or serve as the arbitrator for the arbitration
proceeding unless, at the time the person is appointed as arbitrator, and
thereafter throughout the duration of the arbitration proceeding, such
Public Act No. 26-92 46 of 55

Substitute Senate Bill No. 475
person is a member in good standing of the bar of this state, unless all
parties to the agreement to arbitrate execute a written waiver of the
requirements of this subsection as relate to the arbitrator's
qualifications. Any party to an arbitration agreement shall have not
more than fourteen days after the date of appointment of the arbitrator
to object to such appointment on grounds that the arbitrator fails to meet
the requirements of this subsection. For any arbitration proceeding
pending in this state on July 1, 2026, in which an evidentiary hearing has
not commenced, any party to the arbitration proceeding may file a
written objection to the continued service of the arbitrator. A
determination on the objection to the continued service of the arbitrator
and whether a successor arbitrator is to be appointed shall be made in
accordance with the provisions of this section.
Sec. 25. Section 52-411 of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
(a) If, in a written agreement to arbitrate, a method of appointing an
arbitrator or arbitrators or an umpire has been provided, the method
shall be followed.
(b) If no method is provided therein, or if a method is provided and
any party thereto fails to use the method, or if for any other reason there
is a failure in the naming of an arbitrator or arbitrators or an umpire, or
if any arbitrator or umpire dies or is unable or refuses to serve, upon
application by a party to the arbitration agreement, the superior court
for the judicial district in which one of the parties resides or, in a
controversy concerning land, for the judicial district in which the land
is situated or, when the court is not in session, any judge thereof, shall
appoint an arbitrator or arbitrators or an umpire, as the case may
require. A person so appointed an arbitrator or umpire shall act under
any arbitration agreement with the same force and effect as if he had
been specifically named or referred to therein. Unless otherwise
provided in the agreement, the arbitration shall be by a single arbitrator.
Public Act No. 26-92 47 of 55

Substitute Senate Bill No. 475
(c) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (a) of this section,
when an agreement to arbitrate includes the method for selecting an
arbitrator for an arbitration proceeding to be conducted in this state, no
person may be appointed or serve as the arbitrator for the arbitration
proceeding unless, at the time the person is appointed as arbitrator, and
thereafter throughout the duration of the arbitration proceeding, such
person is a member in good standing of the bar of this state, unless all
parties to the agreement to arbitrate execute a written waiver of the
requirements of this subsection as relate to the arbitrator's
qualifications. Any party to an arbitration agreement shall have not
more than fourteen days (1) after the date of appointment of the
arbitrator to object to such appointment on grounds that the arbitrator
fails to meet the requirements of this subsection, and (2) to object to the
arbitrator's continued role in an arbitration proceeding after receiving
actual notice in writing which informs the parties that the arbitrator is
no longer a member in good standing of the bar of this state. For any
arbitration proceeding pending in this state on July 1, 2026, in which an
evidentiary hearing has not commenced, any party to the arbitration
proceeding may file a written objection to the continued service of the
arbitrator. A determination on the objection to the continued service of
the arbitrator and whether a successor arbitrator is to be appointed shall
be made in accordance with the provisions of this section.
[(c)] (d) An application under this section and the proceedings
thereon shall conform to the application and proceedings provided for
in section 52-410, except that such changes shall be made in the
complaint as may be necessary to [correctly and concisely] state the
plaintiff's claim correctly and concisely.
Sec. 26. Subsection (a) of section 54-65a of the general statutes is
repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October
1, 2026):
(a) (1) Whenever an arrested person is released upon the execution of
Public Act No. 26-92 48 of 55

Substitute Senate Bill No. 475
a bond with surety in an amount of five hundred dollars or more and
such bond is ordered forfeited because the principal failed to appear in
court as conditioned in such bond, the court shall, at the time of ordering
the bond forfeited: (A) Issue a rearrest warrant or a capias directing a
proper officer to take the defendant into custody, (B) provide written or
electronic notice to the surety on the bond that the principal has failed
to appear in court as conditioned in such bond, except that if the surety
on the bond is an insurer, as defined in section 38a-660, the court shall
provide such notice to such insurer and not to the surety bail bond
agent, as defined in section 38a-660, and (C) order a stay of execution
upon the forfeiture for six months. The court may, in its discretion and
for good cause shown, extend such stay of execution. A stay of execution
shall not prevent the issuance of a rearrest warrant or a capias.
(2) When the principal whose bond has been forfeited is returned to
custody pursuant to the rearrest warrant or a capias within six months
after the date such bond was ordered forfeited or, if a stay of execution
was extended, within the time period inclusive of such extension of the
date such bond was ordered forfeited, the bond shall be automatically
terminated and the surety released and the court shall order new
conditions of release for the defendant in accordance with section
54-64a.
(3) When the principal whose bond has been forfeited returns to court
voluntarily within five business days after the date such bond was
ordered forfeited, the court may, in its discretion, and after finding that
the defendant's failure to appear was not wilful, vacate the forfeiture
order and reinstate the bond.
Sec. 27. Subsection (a) of section 38a-660h of the general statutes is
repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October
1, 2026):
(a) If collateral security or other indemnity was received on a bail
Public Act No. 26-92 49 of 55

Substitute Senate Bill No. 475
bond by a surety bail bond agent and such bond is terminated, the
insurer, managing general agent or surety bail bond agent shall return
the collateral security or other indemnity, except a promissory note or
an indemnity agreement, not later than twenty-one days after receipt of
[a written report] written or electronic notice from the court that an
electronic report is available indicating that the bail bond has been
terminated. Such collateral security or other indemnity shall be returned
to the person who provided the collateral security or other indemnity
unless another disposition is provided for by legal assignment to
another person of the right to receive the return of the collateral security
or other indemnity. If, despite diligent inquiry by the insurer or
managing general agent to determine whether the bail bond has been
terminated, the court fails to provide notice of any [written] electronic
report on termination, the collateral security or other indemnity, except
a promissory note or an indemnity agreement, shall be returned to the
person who provided the collateral security or other indemnity not later
than twenty-one days after the insurer, managing general agent or
surety bail bond agent has become aware that the bail bond has been
terminated.
Sec. 28. Section 51-56a of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(a) Each clerk of the Supreme Court and Superior Court shall account
for and pay or deposit all fees, fines, forfeitures and contributions made
to the Criminal Injuries Compensation Fund and the proceeds of
judgments of such clerk's office in the manner provided by section 4-32.
If any such clerk fails to so account and pay or deposit, such failure shall
be reported by the Treasurer to the Chief Court Administrator who may
thereupon remove the clerk. When any such clerk dies before so
accounting and paying or depositing, the Treasurer shall require the
executor of such clerk's will or administrator of such clerk's estate to so
account. If any such clerk is removed from office, the Treasurer shall
Public Act No. 26-92 50 of 55

Substitute Senate Bill No. 475
require such clerk to account for any money of the state remaining in
such clerk's hands at the time of such removal and, if such clerk neglects
to so account, the Treasurer shall certify the neglect to the Chief Court
Administrator.
(b) (1) The state shall remit to the municipalities in which the
violations occurred all amounts received in respect to the violation of
subdivision (2) of subsection (a) of section 14-12, sections 14-251, 14-252,
14-253a and 14-305 to 14-308, inclusive, or any regulation adopted
thereunder or ordinance enacted in accordance therewith, and (2) in the
case of the municipalities ranked one to eight, inclusive, when all
municipalities are ranked from highest to lowest in population, based
on the most recent federal decennial census, the state shall remit to the
municipality in which the violations occurred fifty per cent of the fine
amounts received in respect to the violation of section 14-250b, or any
ordinance enacted in accordance therewith. Each clerk of the Superior
Court or the Chief Court Administrator, or any other official of the
Superior Court designated by the Chief Court Administrator, shall, on
or before the thirtieth day of January, April, July and October in each
year, certify to the Comptroller the amount due for the previous quarter
under this subsection to each municipality served by the office of the
clerk or official, provided prior to the institution of court proceedings, a
city, town or borough shall have the authority to collect and retain all
proceeds from parking violations committed within the jurisdiction of
such city, town or borough.
(c) For the purpose of providing additional funds for municipal and
state police training, each person who pays in any sum as (1) a fine or
forfeiture for any violation of section 14-12, 14-215, 14-219, 14-222, 14-
224, 14-225, 14-227a, 14-227m, 14-227n, 14-266, 14-267a, 14-269 or 14-283,
or (2) a fine or forfeiture for any infraction, shall pay an additional fee
of one dollar for each eight dollars or fraction thereof of the amount such
person is required to pay, except if such payment is made for violation
Public Act No. 26-92 51 of 55

Substitute Senate Bill No. 475
of such a section which is deemed to be an infraction, such additional
fee shall be only on the first eighty-eight dollars of such fine or
forfeiture. Such additional fee charged shall be deposited in the General
Fund.
(d) Each person who pays in any sum as a fine or forfeiture for any
violation of sections 14-218a, 14-219, 14-222, 14-223, 14-227a, 14-227m,
14-227n, sections 14-230 to 14-240, inclusive, sections 14-241 to 14-249,
inclusive, section 14-279 for the first offense, sections 14-289b, 14-299,
14-300, 14-300d, 14-300j, sections 14-301 to 14-303, inclusive, or any
regulation adopted under said sections or ordinance enacted in
accordance with said sections shall pay an additional fee of twenty-five
dollars. The state shall remit to the municipalities in which the violations
occurred the amounts paid under this subsection. Each clerk of the
Superior Court or the Chief Court Administrator, or any other official of
the Superior Court designated by the Chief Court Administrator, on or
before the thirtieth day of January, April, July and October in each year,
shall certify to the Comptroller the amount due for the previous quarter
under this subsection to each municipality served by the office of the
clerk or official.
(e) The state shall remit to the municipalities in which the violation
occurred all fine amounts received in respect to the violation of section
14-279 after crediting twelve per cent of such fine amounts to the Special
Transportation Fund established under section 13b-68 and crediting
eight per cent of such fine amounts to the General Fund. Each clerk of
the Superior Court or the Chief Court Administrator, or any other
official of the Superior Court designated by the Chief Court
Administrator, shall, on or before the thirtieth day of January, April, July
and October in each year, certify to the Comptroller the amount due for
the previous quarter under this subsection to each municipality served
by the office of the clerk or official.
(f) The state shall remit to a lake authority, established pursuant to
Public Act No. 26-92 52 of 55

Substitute Senate Bill No. 475
section 7-151a, all amounts received in respect to any fine issued by such
lake authority for any violation of chapter 268. Each clerk of the Superior
Court or the Chief Court Administrator, or any other official of the
Superior Court designated by the Chief Court Administrator, shall, on
or before the thirtieth day of January, April, July and October in each
year, certify to the Comptroller the amount due for the previous quarter
under this subsection to each lake authority served by the office of the
clerk or official.
Sec. 29. Section 6-32g of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective from passage):
After December 1, 2000, the Chief Court Administrator shall require
an applicant for employment as a judicial marshal pursuant to sections
6-32d and 6-32f to submit to a criminal record background investigation,
to be conducted by the Department of Emergency Services and Public
Protection and the Federal Bureau of Investigation. The applicant shall
pay all processing fees incurred for such investigation. The Judicial
Branch shall determine such applicant's suitability for employment as a
judicial marshal.
Sec. 30. Subsection (f) of section 24 of public act 25-91 is repealed and
the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective from passage):
(f) Not later than January 1, [2027] 2028, the task force shall submit a
report on its findings and recommendations to the joint standing
committee of the General Assembly having cognizance of matters
relating to the judiciary, in accordance with the provisions of section 11-
4a of the general statutes. The task force shall terminate on the date that
it submits such report or January 1, [2027] 2028, whichever is later.
Sec. 31. Subsection (a) of section 51-1f of the 2026 supplement to the
general statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
Public Act No. 26-92 53 of 55

Substitute Senate Bill No. 475
(a) As used in this section:
(1) "Public agency" has the same meaning as provided in section 1-
200.
(2) "Personal information" means a: (A) Home address of a primary
residence; (B) home telephone number; (C) mobile telephone number;
(D) personal electronic mail address; (E) Social Security number; (F)
driver's license number; (G) federal tax identification number; (H)
license plate number or unique identifier of a vehicle; (I) birth or marital
record; or (J) child's name. "Personal information" does not include
information that has been publicly displayed that the protected
individual has not requested to be removed, or information that is
relevant to and displayed as part of a news story, commentary, an
editorial or any other speech on a matter of public concern.
(3) "Protected individual" means: (A) A justice or judge of a court
established under article XX of the State Constitution; (B) a senior judge
appointed pursuant to section 51-50i; (C) a state referee appointed
pursuant to section 52-434; (D) a family support magistrate appointed
pursuant to section 46b-231; (E) a family support referee appointed
pursuant to section 46b-236; (F) a federal district judge, a federal court
of appeals judge, a federal bankruptcy judge, or a federal magistrate
judge, if such judge is a resident of Connecticut; and [(F)] (G) a spouse,
a child or a dependent who resides in the same household as an
individual described in subparagraphs (A) to [(E)] (F), inclusive, of this
subdivision.
(4) "Publish" means to post or otherwise make available to the public
on the Internet, social media or social networks.
Sec. 32. (NEW) (Effective July 1, 2026) (a) Upon the release of any
person from a correctional facility, the Department of Correction shall
disburse to such person the remaining balance in such person's Inmate
Public Act No. 26-92 54 of 55

Substitute Senate Bill No. 475
Trust Fund account. The department may make such disbursement to
the formerly incarcerated person in the form of cash, a check or a
prepaid device, provided the department may not disburse funds by
means of a prepaid device unless the department also provides the
formerly incarcerated person with at least one alternative option of
receiving the disbursed funds by cash or check.
(b) In any situation where the department is unable to make such
disbursement upon release of such person because the department was
not informed of the person's release date at least two weeks in advance
of such date, the department shall request a mailing address from such
person prior to, or at the time of, such person's release, and mail such
disbursement to such person when a mailing address has been
provided. In any such situation, not later than two weeks after such
person is released, the department shall mail the disbursement by
United States mail to the mailing address provided by the formerly
incarcerated person.
(c) If the department disburses funds by means of a prepaid device
pursuant to this section, neither the department nor the issuer of the
prepaid device may impose, or cause to be imposed, any fee payable by
the formerly incarcerated person. As used in this section, "prepaid
device" means a card, code or other means of access to a consumer's
account held by a financial institution or other financial service
provider.
Governor's Action:
Approved June 4, 2026
Public Act No. 26-92 55 of 55